nds_de.dic
afbill/s
afdeck/s
afdreih/s
afhaal/s
aflehn/s
aflever/s
afprall/s
afschick/s
afsenn/s
Afsicht/N
aktiveer/s
alfabeetsch/EN
analoog/EN
andock/s
Aschammer/L
Befehl/Z
begrabbeln/IDWMO
besünner/CZL
betten/IDWMOJPÜ
beweeg/DWMO
Bindfaden/L
birsen/IDWMO
blieven/IWAQHPTUVX
blifft/AQHPTUVX
bögen/QRSEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
bogen/QRSEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
bagen/QRSEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
breken/AQPTVÜ
bröken/AQPTVÜ
bringen/IDWAQRJPSEUVFX
brochen/IDWMOAQRJPSEUVFX
buddeln/IDWMOQRJNGTUVÜ
buu/DWAQBJPTEUVF
Dackfenster/L
danken/IDWMO
danzen/IDWMOQSEHNKGFXÜ
daav/DWMO
Deepd/CZ
deinstalleer/DWMO
Diagramm/Z
Dia/L
deit/APTVX
dörven/IDW
drabbeln/IDWMO
drang/CZ
droop/DABJT
dropen/ABJT
dregen/AQBJPTSEUVFX
dreeg/WAQBJPTSEUVFX
driggst/AQBJPTSEUVFX
driggt/AQBJPTSEUVFX
droog/DAQBJPTSEUVFX
dragen/AQBJPTSEUVFX
dreihen/IDWMOAQRPTSEVXÜ
drieven/IWQABRSEPNKGTUVXÜ
driffst/QABRSEPNKGTUVXÜ
drifft/QABRSEPNKGTUVXÜ
dreev/DQABRSEPNKGTUVXÜ
dreven/QABRSEPNKGTUVXÜ
drucken/IDWMOQBJPU
dubbelklicken/IDWMO
duken/IDWMOQREJPX
duller/CZ
dunnern/IDWMO
düütlich/CZ
Dwarsdriever/L
dwingen/IDWMOBPV
Eck/Z
eet/DAPTUFX
explodeer/DWMO
fallen/IDWAQBRJPNGTEUVX
fullen/IDAQBRJPNGTEUVX
farven/IDWMOQRJUVÜ
Feend/Z
feern/CZ
filtern/IDWMORU
flaggen/IDWMOBJUÜ
flechten/IDWMOARJPNKGTUVFÜ
flegen/AQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
fleeg/WAQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
flagen/AQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
fleten/QRJUX
flicken/IDWMOAJPNKTU
föddern/IDWMOAQJP
föhlen/IDWMOABREJF
fohren/IDWMOAQBRJHPNKGSEUVFX
foolden/IDWMOJTU
fritt/DQARJPNGTUVX
füllen/IDWMOABJPTÜR
gahn/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
gah/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
gung/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
gungst/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
güngen/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
geev/ABQRJPGTSEUVFX
gifft/ABRJPGTSEUVFX
geevst/ABRJPGTSEUVFX
glimmern/IDW
glöhen/IDWMOARPGUVX
graleren/BHF
graven/QRJPNGUVFÜ
graav/DWQRJPNGUVFÜ
griepen/IWAQBRJPTSUVFX
grippt/AQBRJPTSUVFX
greep/DAQBRJPTSUVFX
griepsch/CZ
groffst/CZ
haal/DWMOQVUSPJHNKG
hest/AF
heev/DWMOARPNKGUVX
hinnern/IDWMOBV
hool/WAQBRJPTSEUVF
heel/DAQBRJPTSEUVF
Hopen/L
hören/AFJPTSEVX
importeer/DWMO
installeer/DWMO
jumpen/IDWMOAQRSEJPNKGTVFX
kamen/ABRHPNKGSEUVFX
kumm/DWABRHPNKGSEUVFX
keltsch/CZ
kippen/IDWMOQARHNKGTUVXÜ
klaag/DWMOABRJGVX
Klemm/Z
klöönten/QBRU
kniepen/IWQBRT
kneep/DQBRT
knüppen/IDWMOAQJTVÜ
kommenteren/RJGUX
kompletteer/DWMO
kunnen/IDWMOQ
konverteer/DWMO
köffen/AQJPTVFX
körten/IDMOQJVX
kriggt/QJPNKGEX
kregen/QJPNKGEX
krüüz/WMOAQRJP
Küsel/L
langen/IDWMOABRSETV
langsamst/CZ
laat/AQBRJHTUVX
leet/DAQBRJHTUVX
leten/AQBRJHTUVX
leed/DAQBJPTSEUVFX
lehnen/IDWMOAQSEFX
lichten/IDWMOQABPNKGX
lierlütt/CZ
listen/IDWMOP
luern/BP
luur/DWMOBP
mahnen/IDWMOQAV
maken/AQJHPTUVFX
maak/DWMOAQJHPTUVFX
maal/DWMOQABHPNKUVFXÜ
meldten/AQJV
meet/DQBPTUV
mitt/QBPTUV
nöhmen/IDAQJPTSEUVFX
nahmen/AQJPTSEUVFX
Nettweg/Z
nööm/DWMOÜ
Oorinwahner/L
opgradeer/DWMO
ööv/DWMOJUV
överscherig/CZ
planen/BEJTVFÜ
plaanten/BEJTVFÜ
punkteren/HU
quadraatsch/CZ
quääl/DWMOQRSENKG
radeer/DWMOGUX
reken/AQBEJPTUVFXÜ
revolutschoneer/DWMO
rieden/IWARSEJHNKGTUFXÜ
reden/ARSEJHNKGTUFXÜ
ritt/AQBRJPUVX
reet/DAQBRJPUVX
reven/QRJPVX
Riffel/L
röppst/AQBRPTU
rücken/IDWQSEJPUVFXÜ
rullen/IDWMOQJPEUX
sammeln/IDWMOQAJHPNKGUVFX
schalten/IDWMOAQJPTUVFXÜ
schaap/DWMOABSENKGX
schoot/DQBRJP
schienen/IDWABRPGV
scheten/QABNKGTUVX
schriffst/AQBRJPNTEUVFÜ
schreev/DAQBRJPNTEUVFÜ
schreven/AQBRJPNTEUVFÜ
schuuv/WAQRJPNKGTSEVFX
schufft/AQRJPNKGTSEVFX
schoov/DAQRJPNKGTSEVFX
seen/AQRPTUVF
seht/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
seegst/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
sekern/IDWMOQBTV
setten/IDWMOAQBRJPNKGTESUVFXÜ
slaan/AQBREJHPTUFX
sloog/DAQBREJHPTUFX
slogen/AQBREJHPTUFX
slanker/CZ
slaap/WBRJTUVFX
slöppt/BRJTUVFX
smeer/DWMOQABJHPNKTUVFX
smitt/AQBJGTSEX
smolten/QRJPNGUVXÜ
snackhaftig/CZ
snappen/IDWMOJHPTX
snieden/IWAQBRJPTUVX
speel/DWMOAQJPTUVF
spiegen/IWABREHNKGUX
spiggst/ABREHNKGUX
spegen/MOABREHNKGUX
spioneer/DWMOU
spreken/QABRNRGUVF
sprook/DQABRNRGUVF
springen/IDWAQRJPX
steiht/AQBRJPTUVF
stunnen/IDAQBRJPTUVF
steek/DWAQBRJPTEUVX
stickt/AQBRJPTEUVX
stiegen/IWAQBRJPTUV
steeg/DAQBRJPTUV
stoop/DWMOQAKÜ
stööt/AQRSEPTUVX
stötten/AQRSEPTUVX
strahlen/IDWMOQABRSEJNGTUV
strickst/ARJUVFX
streek/DARJUVFX
sugen/QARJPNKGUX
suug/WQARJPNKGUX
süggt/QARJPNKGUX
sogen/QARJPNKGUX
sagen/QARJPNKGUX
sweev/DWMOAQRSEJFXÜ
Tab/L
trecken/IDWQABRSEJHPNKGTUVFXÜ
trocken/IDQABRSEJHPNKGTUVFXÜ
vörig/CZ
wachten/IDWMOQPTV
wanneln/IDWMOÜ
warmst/CZ
wassen/IDWABRSEJPTUV
wendte/AQBJPEVX
werken/IDWMOBV
Winter/L
wohren/IDWMOBV
amhaarsch/EN
britsch/EN
indoneesch/EN
kornisch/EN
mongoolsch/EN
russ'sch/EN
swiezerdüütsch/EN
usbeeksch/EN
